Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 64 PRIVATE OCCUPATIONAL SCHOOLS
23-64-117. Agent's permits.

In-state schools.

Any person desiring to engage in the performance of the duties of an agent for a school located within this state shall be registered by the school upon forms to be provided by the division. The registration shall include the following:

A statement signed by the applicant that he or she has read the provisions of the "Private Occupational Education Act of 1981" and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto;

A fee as required by this article 64.

An agent representing more than one school must obtain a separate agent's permit for each school represented; except that an agent holding a valid agent's permit to represent a school shall not be required to obtain a separate permit to represent another school owned by the same entity to the same extent and having the same name as the first school.

An agent's permit shall be issued to the agent and shall state in a clear and conspicuous manner the name of the agent, the name and location of the school he or she represents, and the date of issuance and term of the permit.

An agent's permit shall expire on the same date as the certificate of approval for the school that the agent represents expires.

Out-of-state schools.

Any person desiring to engage in the performance of the duties as an agent within this state, for a school located outside this state, shall make application through the school to the board upon forms to be provided by the division. The application shall include the following:

A statement signed by the applicant that he or she has read the provisions of the "Private Occupational Education Act of 1981" and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto;

A surety bond as required in this article 64;

A fee as required by this article 64.

An application submitted by an applicant who intends to represent a school located outside this state shall not be acted upon until any information regarding the school that is required to be submitted by the board, including the name and Colorado address of a designated agent upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served, has been received.

An agent representing more than one school must obtain a separate agent's permit for each school represented; except that an agent holding a valid agent's permit to represent a school shall not be required to obtain a separate permit to represent another school owned by the same entity to the same extent and having the same name as the first school.

Following the review and evaluation of an application and any further information required by the board to be submitted by the applicant and an investigation and appraisal of an applicant as the board deems necessary or appropriate, the board shall recommend to the executive director either a grant or denial of an agent's permit to the applicant.

An agent's permit shall be issued to the agent and shall state in a clear and conspicuous manner the name of the agent, the name and location of the school he or she represents, and the date of issuance and term of the permit.

An agent's permit shall expire annually on June 30. An agent's permit shall also expire upon termination of his or her employment with the school named on the permit.

An agent's permit issued for the purpose of representing a school located outside this state shall be suspended by operation of law when the school fails to maintain in this state an agent upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served.

At least sixty days prior to the expiration of an agent's permit, the agent shall complete and file with the board an application form and fee for renewal of the permit. The application shall be reviewed and acted upon as provided in this article 64. If the application is not submitted as set forth in this section, the agent's existing permit shall expire on July 1.

The board shall not be required to act upon an application submitted by an agent whose permit has been revoked or denied by a final nonappealable order of the board for a period of twelve months subsequent to the revocation or denial. Notwithstanding that an order of revocation or denial shall be subject to judicial review, the agent shall otherwise comply with and be subject to the provisions of this article 64; except that the agent shall not be required to submit an application as required by this section.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1190, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-111 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-118. Denial of application for certificate of approval or agent's permit.

If the board, upon review of an application for a certificate of approval or for an agent's permit, determines upon reasonable belief that the applicant fails to meet any one or more of the criteria established pursuant to this article 64, the board shall submit to the applicant a notice of noncompliance setting forth the reasons therefor in writing. The notice shall set forth a period of time within which the applicant may submit written data, arguments, views, or information with respect to the reasons set forth in the notice and during which time the applicant shall also be afforded the opportunity to eliminate the reason for the notice.

The board shall consider the written data, arguments, views, or information submitted and the steps taken by the applicant to comply and shall thereafter determine upon reasonable belief whether a hearing shall be conducted for the purpose of denying the application.

An application for a certificate of approval or an agent's permit may also be denied by the board if the applicant has furnished false or misleading written or oral statements, documents, or other representations to the board with the intent to mislead or conceal the truth of any matter to be considered by the board as a factor in approving the application.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, the provisions of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, shall apply to the denial of an application for a certificate of approval submitted by a new school and to the denial of an initial application for an agent's permit.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1191, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-112 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-119. Revocation of certificate of approval and agent's permit.

If the board determines upon reasonable belief that the holder of a certificate of approval or an agent's permit has violated or is violating any one or more of the criteria established pursuant to this article 64, the board or its authorized designee shall submit to the holder or a school's designated agent for service of process a notice of noncompliance setting forth the reasons therefor in writing. The notice shall set forth a period of time within which the applicant may submit written data, views, arguments, or information with respect to the reasons set forth in the notice and during which time the holder shall also be afforded the opportunity to eliminate the reason for the notice.

The board shall consider the written data, arguments, views, or information submitted and the steps taken by the holder to comply and shall thereafter determine upon reasonable belief whether a hearing shall be conducted for the purpose of revoking the certificate of approval or an agent's permit.

If the board has reasonable grounds to believe and finds that the holder has willfully and deliberately violated the criteria established pursuant to this article 64 or that the public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and incorporates such findings in its order, it may summarily suspend the certificate of approval or agent's permit pending a hearing, which shall be promptly instituted and determined.

A certificate of approval or an agent's permit may also be revoked by the board if the holder thereof has furnished false or misleading written or oral statements, documents, or other representations to the board with the intent to mislead or conceal the truth of any matter considered by the board as a factor in approving the application for a certificate of approval or an agent's permit or for continuing in effect the certificate of approval or an agent's permit.

A certificate of approval may be revoked by the board if the holder thereof has had its surety bond canceled and has not replaced it within fifteen days prior to the effective date of the bond termination.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1192, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-113 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-120. Refund policy.

As a condition for granting a certificate of approval or an agent's permit to represent a school located outside this state, a school shall maintain a policy for the refund of tuition and fees in the event, and within thirty days of the date, a student fails to enter the course, withdraws, or has been discontinued therefrom at any time prior to completion. The policy shall provide for at least the following:

A full refund of all money paid if the applicant is not accepted by the school;

A full refund of tuition and fees paid if the applicant withdraws within three days after signing the contract or making an initial payment if the applicant has not commenced training;

A full refund of tuition and fees paid in the event that the school discontinues a course or program of education during a period of time within which a student could have reasonably completed the same; except that this provision shall not apply in the event that the school ceases operation;

That the school use a method of determining the official termination date of the student that complies with the established criteria of the state board for community colleges and occupational education;

That except for retention of a cancellation charge not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars or twenty-five percent of the contract price, whichever is less, the policy for cancellation, settlement, and refund of tuition and fees provides for at least the following:

For a student terminating his or her training within the first ten percent of his or her program, the student shall be entitled to a refund of ninety percent of the contract price of the program exclusive of books, tools, and supplies;

For a student terminating his or her training after ten percent but within the first twenty-five percent of his or her program, the student shall be entitled to a refund of seventy-five percent of the contract price of the program exclusive of books, tools, and supplies;

For a student terminating his or her training after twenty-five percent but within the first fifty percent of his or her program, the student shall be entitled to a refund of fifty percent of the contract price of the program exclusive of books, tools, and supplies;

For a student terminating his or her training after fifty percent but within the first seventy-five percent of his or her program, the student shall be entitled to a refund of twenty-five percent of the contract price of the program exclusive of books, tools, and supplies;

A student who has completed seventy-five percent of his or her program and has entered the final twenty-five percent shall not be entitled to any refund and shall be obligated for the full price of the program, which constitutes the maximum obligation.

A school offering education using an individualized instruction method shall:

(I) Establish a time period during which a student should complete the training;

(II) Outline school policies relative to satisfactory progress, including an average rate of assignment completion;

(III) Establish a policy for termination in the event that a student does not maintain the rate of assignment completion.

Under these conditions, a refund of tuition and fees required by this section may be computed based on the time period or on assignments completed in accordance with the policy previously adopted by the school.

The board may require a school to submit to the board a notice of each tuition refund paid or contract canceled in the manner and to the extent determined by the board.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1192, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-114 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-121. Bonds - definitions.

Schools located within this state shall file as a part of their application for a certificate of approval evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, or one bond as set forth in this section covering the school and its agents. Schools located outside this state shall file evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, or bonds as set forth in this section covering the school's agents.

At the time application is made for a certificate of approval, the board shall require an applicant to file with the division a surety bond in a sum as determined pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The bond shall be executed by the applicant as principal and by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The bond shall be conditioned to provide indemnification to any student or enrollee or to any parent or guardian of the student or enrollee determined by the board to have suffered loss of tuition or any fees as a result of any act or practice that is a violation of any minimum standard as set forth in this article 64 or any criterion established pursuant thereto by a school or its agents, to provide train-out for students enrolled in an approved school ceasing operation as provided in subsection (5) of this section, and to reimburse the department of higher education for any actual administrative and related costs associated with an approved school ceasing operation. The bond shall be continuous unless the surety is released as set forth in this section.

The amount of the bond to be submitted with an application for a certificate of approval shall be equal to a reasonable estimate of the maximum prepaid, unearned tuition and fees of the school for a period or term during the applicable school training year for which programs of instruction are offered, including, but not limited to, on a semester, quarter, monthly, or class basis; except that the period or term of greatest duration and expense shall be utilized for this computation where a school's training year consists of one or more such periods or terms. Following the initial filing of the surety bond with the division, the amount of the bond shall be recalculated annually based upon a reasonable estimate of the maximum prepaid, unearned tuition and fees received by the school for such period or term. In no case shall the amount of the bond be less than five thousand dollars.

A student, enrollee, or parent or guardian of the student or enrollee claiming loss of tuition or fees may file a claim with the board if the claim results from an act or practice that violates a minimum standard or criterion established pursuant to section 23-64-112. Such claims that are filed with the board shall constitute public records and are subject to the provisions of article 72 of title 24; except that no such claims records shall be made public if the release would violate any federal privacy law.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4)(a) of this section, the board shall not consider any claim that is filed more than two years after the date the student discontinues his or her training at the school.

In the event that a private occupational school ceases operation, the board is authorized to make demand on the surety of the school upon the demand for a refund by a student or for the implementation of a train-out for the students of the school, and is authorized to make demand on the surety to reimburse the department of higher education for actual administrative costs associated with the school ceasing operation, and the surety shall pay the claim due in a timely manner. To the extent practicable, the board shall use the amount of the bond to provide train-out for students of the private occupational school ceasing operation through a contract with another approved private occupational school, a community college, an area technical college, or any other training arrangement acceptable to the board. The train-out provided to a student replaces the original enrollment agreement or contract between the student and the private occupational school ceasing operation; except that tuition and fee payments shall be made by the student as required by the original enrollment agreement or contract.

Any student enrolled in a private occupational school ceasing operation who declines the train-out required to be offered pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section may file a claim with the board for the student's prorated share of the prepaid, unearned tuition and fees paid by the student subject to the limitations of subsection (5)(c) of this section. No subsequent payment shall be made to a student, unless proof of satisfaction of any prior debt to a financial institution is submitted in accordance with the board rules concerning the administration of this section.

If the amount of the bond is less than the total prepaid, unearned tuition and fees that have been paid by students at the time the private occupational school ceased operation, the amount of the bond shall be prorated among the students.

Any amount of the surety that is greater than the amount necessary to satisfy costs to provide a train-out for students pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section and any demand for a refund by a student pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section may be retained by the department of higher education as reimbursement up to the amount of any actual administrative costs incurred by the department of higher education that are associated with the school closure.

The provisions of this subsection (5) shall be applicable only to those students enrolled in the private occupational school at the time it ceases operation, and, once a school ceases operation, no new students shall be enrolled therein.

The board shall be designated as the trustee for all prepaid, unearned tuition and fees, student loans, Pell grants, and other student financial aid assistance in the event that an approved private occupational school ceases operation.

The board shall determine whether the offering of a train-out for students enrolled in an approved private occupational school ceasing operation is practicable without federal government designation of the board as trustee for student loans, Pell grants, and other student financial aid assistance pursuant to subsection (5)(e) of this section.

At the time that application is made for an agent's permit to represent a school located outside this state, the application shall be accompanied by a surety bond in the sum of fifty thousand dollars. The bond shall be executed by the applicant as principal and by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The bond shall be conditioned to provide indemnification to any student or enrollee or his or her parent or guardian determined by the board to have suffered loss of tuition or any fees as a result of any act or practice that is a violation of any deceptive trade or sales practice as set forth in this article 64 or any criteria established pursuant thereto by the agent. Regardless of the number of years that the bond is in force, the aggregate liability of the surety thereon shall in no event exceed the penal sum of the bond. The bond shall be continuous, unless the surety is released as set forth in this section, and may be blanket in form. Any student or enrollee or his or her parent or guardian claiming loss of tuition or any fees as a result of any deceptive trade or sales practice shall file a notarized claim with the board. In no event, however, shall the board consider any such complaint filed one hundred eighty days after the date the student discontinued his or her training at the school.

Except with respect to a claim for tuition and fees made by a student enrolled in an approved private occupational school ceasing operation, the board shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining any loss of tuition or fees, and, if any claim is found to be correct and due the claimant, the board shall make demand upon the principal and the surety on the bond. If the principal or surety fails or refuses to pay the claim due, the board shall commence an action on the bond in any court of competent jurisdiction; except that no such action may be filed more than six years subsequent to the date of any violation that gives rise to the right to file a claim pursuant to this section. A claim for tuition and fees made by a student enrolled in an approved private occupational school ceasing operation shall be handled in the manner provided in subsection (5) of this section.

A certificate of approval or an agent's permit shall be suspended by operation of law when the school or agent is no longer covered by a surety bond as required by this section. The board shall give written notice to the school or agent, or both, at the last-known address, at least forty-five days prior to the release of the surety, to the effect that the certificate of approval or agent's permit shall be suspended by operation of law until another surety bond is filed in the same manner and like amount as the bond being released.

A surety on any bond filed under the provisions of this section shall be released therefrom after the surety serves written notice thereof to the board at least sixty days prior to the release. The release shall not discharge or otherwise affect any claim filed by any student or enrollee or his or her parent or guardian for loss of tuition or any fees that occurred while the bond was in effect or that occurred under any note or contract executed during any period of time when the bond was in effect, except when another bond is filed in a like amount and provides indemnification for any such loss.

The board shall allow, at a reasonable price, alternate surety methods in lieu of the bonding requirements of this section. The alternate sureties shall be conditioned to provide indemnification to any student or enrollee or to any parent or guardian of the student or enrollee for any loss of tuition or any fees as a result of any act or practice that is a violation of this article 64 and to provide train-out for students enrolled in an approved school ceasing operation as provided in subsection (5) of this section. In the event that a school covered by an alternate surety ceases operation, the board shall act in the manner provided in subsection (5) of this section.

Prior to September 1, 1991, and each year thereafter, any alternate surety allowed by the board shall be required to contract for an independent financial audit. The audit shall be included in a report to the board due by January 1 of the following year. The board may disapprove an alternate surety if it deems that the surety is not able to provide students with the indemnification and train-out required by this section.

For the purposes of this section, "school" and "private occupational school" shall include a for-profit private college or university, as defined in section 23-2-102 (11), in which the majority of students are enrolled in courses and programs that are occupational in nature, as defined by the board.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1194, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(2) and (5)(a) amended and (5)(c.5) added, (SB 18-177), ch. 196, p. 1289, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-115 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-122. Fees - private occupational schools fund - annual adjustment - rules.

The board by rule shall establish fees for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of this article 64, which fees shall accompany any application for a certificate of approval for a new school or for a school other than a new school, for an in-state or out-of-state agent's permit, or for a change of ownership. All fees collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the private occupational schools fund, which fund is hereby created. The money in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of this article 64. All money credited to the fund shall be used for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of this article 64 and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund of this state or to any other fund.

In addition to the fees specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board by rule shall establish and receive fees for reviewing the qualifications of and for issuing appropriate credentials to instructors and administrators pursuant to section 23-64-112 (1)(e). Such fees shall be collected and administered in the same manner as the fees specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The board shall propose, as part of the division's annual budget request, an adjustment in the amount of the fees that it is authorized to collect pursuant to this section. The budget request and the adjusted fees shall reflect the direct and indirect costs of administering this article 64.

Based upon the appropriation made, the board shall adjust its fees so that the revenue generated from the fees approximates the direct and indirect costs of administering this article 64. The adjusted fees must remain in effect for the fiscal year for which the budget request applies.

Beginning July 1, 1995, and each July 1 thereafter, whenever money appropriated to the division for its activities for the prior fiscal year are unexpended, the money shall be made a part of the appropriation to the division for the next fiscal year, and the amount shall not be raised from fees collected by the division. If a supplemental appropriation is made to the division for its activities, the division's fees shall be adjusted in the following fiscal year by an additional amount that is sufficient to compensate for the supplemental appropriation. Funds appropriated to the division in the annual general appropriations bill shall be designated as cash funds and shall not exceed the amount anticipated to be raised from fees collected by the division.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1197, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-116 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-123. Deceptive trade or sales practices.

It is a deceptive trade or sales practice for:

A school or agent to make or cause to be made any statement or representation, oral, written, or visual, in connection with the offering of educational services if the school or agent knows or reasonably should have known the statement or representation to be false, substantially inaccurate, or misleading;

A school or agent to represent falsely, directly or by implication, through the use of a trade or business name or in any other manner, including the use of "help wanted" or other employment columns in a newspaper or other publication, that it is an employment agency or agent or authorized training facility for another industry or member of such industry or to otherwise deceptively conceal the fact that it is a school;

A school or agent to represent falsely, directly or by implication, that any of its educational services have been approved by a particular industry or that successful completion thereof qualifies a student for admission to a labor union or similar organization or for the receipt of a state license to perform certain functions;

A school or agent to represent falsely, directly or by implication, that the lack of a high school education, prior training, or experience is not a handicap or impediment to completing successfully a course or program of study or for gaining employment in the field for which the educational services were designed;

A school or agent to adopt a name, trade name, or trademark that represents falsely, directly or by implication, the quality, scope, nature, size, or integrity of the school or its educational services;

A school or agent to represent falsely, directly or by implication, that students completing a course or program of instruction successfully may transfer credit therefor to any institution of higher education;

A school or agent to represent falsely, directly or by implication, in its advertising or promotional materials or in any other manner, the size, location, facilities, or equipment of the school, the number or educational experience qualifications of its faculty, the extent or nature of any approval received from any state agency, or the extent or nature of any accreditation received from any accrediting agency or association;

A school or agent to provide prospective students with any testimonials, endorsements, or other information that has the tendency to mislead or deceive prospective students or the public regarding current practices of the school, current conditions for employment opportunities, or probable earnings in the industry or occupation for which the educational services were designed or as a result of the completion of any such educational service;

A school or agent to enroll a student when it is reasonably obvious that the student is unlikely to complete successfully a program of study or is unlikely to qualify for employment in the field for which the education is designed, unless this fact is affirmatively disclosed to the student;

An agent representing an out-of-state school to represent directly or by implication that the school is approved or accredited by the state of Colorado;

A school or agent to designate or refer to its sales representatives as "counselors" or "advisors" or to use words of similar import that have the tendency to mislead or deceive prospective students or the public regarding the authority or qualifications of the sales representatives or agents; or

A school to advertise or otherwise represent that it is accredited unless the school is accredited by an accrediting body that is recognized by the United States department of education or is accredited by a programmatic accrediting body recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation as having the ability to accredit a freestanding, single-purpose institution of construction education.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1198, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1)(k) amended and (1)(l) added, (HB 21-1306), ch. 310, p. 1897, § 5, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-117 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-124. Complaints of deceptive trade or sales practices.

A person claiming pecuniary loss as a result of a deceptive trade or sales practice, pursuant to section 23-64-123, by a school or agent may file with the board a written complaint against the school or agent. The complaint must set forth the alleged violation and any other relevant information as the board may require. A complaint filed under this section is a public record subject to the provisions of article 72 of title 24 and must be filed within two years after the student discontinues his or her training at the school or at any time prior to the commencement of training.

The board shall investigate any such complaint and thereafter may consider the complaint at a hearing. If, upon all the evidence at a hearing, the board finds that a school or agent has engaged in or is engaging in any deceptive trade or sales practice, the board may issue and cause to be served upon the school, the agent, or the designated agent for service of process, notice, or demand an order requiring the school or agent to cease and desist from such practice. The board may obtain an order for enforcement of its order in the district court pursuant to section 24-4-106.

If the board finds that the complainant or class of complainants has suffered pecuniary loss as a result of such practice, the board, at its discretion, may award the complainant or class of complainants full restitution for the loss. The board may also commence a civil action against a school or agent believed by the board to have caused a complainant or class of complainants to suffer pecuniary loss as a result of any deceptive trade or sales practice. Upon a finding that the complainant or class of complainants has suffered pecuniary loss as a result of any deceptive trade or sales practice, the court shall order the school or agent to pay to the complainant or class of complainants full restitution for the loss.

Any person filing a complaint alleging a deceptive trade or sales practice pursuant to this section shall exhaust the remedies provided in this section prior to filing a complaint with the district court alleging a deceptive trade or sales practice.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1199, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-118 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-125. Preservation of records.

In the event that a school located in Colorado ceases operation, the owner or his or her authorized designee shall deposit with the division the original or legible true copies of all educational, financial, or other records of the school.

In the event that it appears to the board that any records of a school located in Colorado that is ceasing operation are in danger of being destroyed, secreted, mislaid, or otherwise made unavailable to the board, the board may seize and take possession of the records upon making application to any court of competent jurisdiction for an appropriate order. The board shall maintain or cause to be maintained a permanent file of any such records.

Any person desiring copies of any such records shall pay a fee as may be established by the board.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1200, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-177), ch. 196, p. 1290, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-119 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-126. Enforceability of notes, contracts, and other evidence of indebtedness.

No note, other instrument of indebtedness, or contract relating to payment for educational services shall be enforceable in the courts of this state by any school located within this state unless the school, at the time of execution of the note, other instrument of indebtedness, or contract, holds a valid certificate of approval nor by any school having an agent in this state unless the agent, who enrolled persons to whom educational services were to be rendered or to whom educational credentials were to be granted, held a valid agent's permit at the time of the execution of the note, other instrument of indebtedness, or contract.

The enforceability of notes, contracts, and other evidence of indebtedness relating to payment for educational services shall be in compliance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations, as amended.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1200, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-120 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-127. Violations - civil - penalty.

The board may commence a civil action against any entity believed by the board to have violated the provisions of section 23-64-113 or who fails or refuses to deposit with the division the records required by section 23-64-125. Upon a finding that the entity has violated the provisions of section 23-64-113 or has failed or refused to deposit with the division the records required by section 23-64-125, the court shall order the entity to pay to the division a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars for each violation. Each day's failure by an entity to comply with the provisions of said section is a separate violation.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1200, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-121 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-128. Violations - criminal - penalty.

Any person, group, or entity, or any owner, officer, agent, or employee thereof, who willfully violates the provisions of section 23-64-113 or who willfully fails or refuses to deposit with the division the records required by section 23-64-125 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1200, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3223, § 402, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-122 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-129. State administrative procedure act.

Unless otherwise provided in this article 64, the provisions of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, shall govern the giving of notices for and the conducting of any hearings on any matter within the authority of the board as set forth in this article 64.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1201, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-123 as it existed prior to 2017.

23-64-130. Jurisdiction of courts - service of process.

Any school located within or without this state that offers to provide educational services to any person in this state, whether the educational services are provided in person or by correspondence, or that offers to award any educational credentials to any person in this state submits the school to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state concerning any cause of action arising therefrom and for the purpose of enforcement of this article 64 by injunction pursuant to section 23-64-131. Service of process upon any such school subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state may be made by personally serving the summons upon the defendant within or without this state in the manner prescribed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure, which shall have the same force and effect as if the summons had been personally served within this state. Nothing contained in this section shall limit or affect the right to serve any process as prescribed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1201, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-59-124 as it existed prior to 2017.